Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB738.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Judge R. Barry McAndrews Memorial Highway.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Judge R. Barry McAndrews was born in Philadelphia and grew up in the West Oak Lane neighborhood where he graduated from LaSalle College High School in 1950.(2) After graduating from LaSalle University in 1954, Judge McAndrews received his Juris Doctor degree from Villanova University School of Law in 1957.(3) Following his graduation from law school, Judge McAndrews served in the United States Marine Corp from 1957 to 1962, receiving the rank of captain while stationed in 12345678910111213141516171819 Hawaii with his wife, Liz, and children.(4) Judge McAndrews held many roles throughout his legal career, including chief counsel at CertainTeed Corporation from 1962 to 1967 and an assistant public defender from 1968 to 1969.(5) Judge McAndrews was a partner in private practice from 1967 to 1991 which led to his appointment as a judge for the Court of Common Pleas of Bucks County in May 1991 by Governor Bob Casey, then he was elected for a 10-year term as the eleventh judge on the bench.(6) While serving on the bench, Judge McAndrews was selected as President Judge in 1999, a role he held until his retirement in 2003.(7) As President Judge, Judge McAndrews was a leading advocate for the building of the new Bucks County Justice Center which opened in January 2015.(8) After many years of service to this Commonwealth and to our country, Judge R. Barry McAndrews passed away on March 23, 2024, at 91 years of age.(b) Designation.--The section of State Route 1006, also known as Ferry Road, from the intersection with Limekiln Road to the intersection with Pennsylvania Route 313, also known as Swamp Road, in Doylestown Township, Bucks County, is designated the Judge R. Barry McAndrews Memorial Highway.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the highway to traffic in both directions on the highway.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0738PN0762 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829